New Jersey, session 222, A4136.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In consultation with the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Health and Senior Services, and the Department of Human Services, the Department of Community Affairs shall prepare, and amend as needed, a five-year housing advisory plan.  The purpose of the plan is to document the affordable housing needs of all residents in this State, especially those of homeless or near homeless persons, determine the extent to which those needs are addressed through public and private sector programs, and facilitate any necessary planning to meet the affordable housing needs of the State, thereby enabling the development of sound strategies and programs for affordable housing.  The information in the five-year housing advisory plan shall include: (1)   an assessment of the States housing market trends; (2)   an assessment of the housing needs for all economic segments of the State and special needs populations; (3)   an inventory of the supply and geographic distribution of affordable housing made available through public and private sector programs; (4)   a status report on the degree of progress made by the public and private sectors toward meeting the housing needs of the State; (5)   an identification of State and local regulatory barriers to affordable housing and proposed regulatory and administrative techniques designed to remove barriers to the development and placement of affordable housing; and (6)   specific recommendations, policies, or proposals for meeting the affordable housing needs of the State, especially those of homeless or near homeless persons. b.   The five-year housing advisory plan required under this subsection shall be prepared and submitted to the Governor and the Legislatures Joint Committee on Housing Affordability, or its successor, 18 months following enactment of P.L.    , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and subsequent plans shall be submitted every five years thereafter. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.